Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Chapter 30. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 31.30.010.
Damages for wrongful extraction of oil or gas.

If oil or gas has been or is extracted from any existing or subsequently drilled well by any person without right but who asserts a claim of right in good faith or who is acting under an honest belief as to the law or the facts, the measure of damages, if there is any right of recovery under existing law, shall be the value of the oil or gas at the time of extraction, without interest, after deducting all costs of development, operation, and production. The costs shall include taxes and interest on all expenditures from the date of the expenditures.

In this section “oil or gas” includes all hydrocarbon minerals.

History.

(§ 1 ch 73 SLA 1964)

Secs. 31.30.040 — 31.30.070.
Gas pipeline impact committee.
[Repealed, § 4 ch 170 SLA 1975.]